Utah statutes.
53-13-107.   Basic training requirements for position -- Peace officers
temporarily in the state.
(1) (a)  Any person who has satisfactorily completed, before the effective
date of this chapter, an approved basic training program required of the
person's position may act in a certified capacity without completion of an
additional basic training program.
(b)  Any person hired, appointed, or elected to any position designated in
this chapter, except federal officer, shall satisfactorily complete the
required basic training required of that position before the person is
authorized to exercise peace officer powers under this chapter.
(2)  Any peace officer employed by a law enforcement agency of another state
and functioning in that capacity within Utah on a temporary basis is
considered certified under Utah law:
(a)  while functioning as a peace officer within the state at the request of a
Utah law enforcement agency; or
(b)  when conducting business as a representative of a law enforcement agency
from another state.
